Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Milk Production

247.4451.
Promotion of milk production in public interest.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of milk shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly in promoting and stimulating, by educational and applied research programs, the increased production of this agricultural commodity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4453.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces milk and causes the same to be marketed as milk;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing milk at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity;

“Milk” means milk from cows and all of its natural components; and

“Purchaser” means any person, including any distributor, processor, or bulk milk handler, who purchases or receives on consignment milk within the state for sale, shipment, storage, processing, or manufacture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4455.
Association activity not considered restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

and intended to benefit all of the producers of this agricultural commodity shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4457.
Assessment in public interest.

It is hereby further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of milk on a commercial basis shall be permitted by referendum to be held among this group and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, to levy upon themselves an assessment on this commodity and provide for the collection of the assessment, for the purpose of financing or contributing toward the financing of educational and applied research programs to improve and enhance the production of milk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4459.
Application to conduct referendum.

Any existing commission, council, board, association, or other agency, such as the Kentucky Milk Producers Association, fairly representative of the producers of the agricultural commodity referred to, may at any time after July 13, 1990, make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of the agricultural commodity, for commercial purposes, upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum. The application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide basis;

Proposed effective date of program; and

Signature of applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4461.
Certification by Commissioner of Agriculture of agency to conduct referendum.

Upon the filing with the State Board of Agriculture of the application on the part of any commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers, the Commissioner shall within thirty (30) days thereafter convene the State Board of Agriculture to consider the application; and if upon the consideration the Board of Agriculture shall find that the commission, council, board, or other agency making the application is fairly representative of and has been duly chosen and delegated as representative of the producers producing the commodity, and shall otherwise find and determine that the application is in conformity with the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

and the purposes stated, then it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Agriculture to certify the commission, council, board, association, or other agency as the duly delegated and authorized group or agency representative of the producers of the agricultural commodity, and shall likewise certify that the agency is duly authorized to conduct among the producers of the commodity a referendum for the purpose stated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4463.
Certification constitutes full authority to conduct referendum.

Upon being certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture in the manner set forth, the commission, council, board, or other agency shall be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of the agricultural commodity a referendum on the question of whether or not the producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under and subject to and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

. The referendum shall be conducted on a statewide basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 7, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4465.
Referendum to be statewide.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

shall be held on a statewide basis. The referendum may be participated in by all producers engaged in the production of the agricultural commodity on a commercial basis, including owners of farms on which the commodity is produced, tenants and sharecroppers sharing in the proceeds of the commodity. In the referendum, the individuals so eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4467.
Referendum to be supervised by Commissioner.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the commission, council, board, or other agency certified in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(9/24/96). References in this statute to the range created by 1990 Ky. Acts ch. 167 were incorrectly codified as “KRS

247.4451

to

247.4453

.” Under KRS 7.136(1)(f), these references have been changed to read “KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

.”

247.4469.
Provisions of referendum to be fixed by Commissioner.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount collected shall be applied. No annual assessment levied under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

shall exceed fifteen hundredths of one percent (0.15%) of the value of the year’s production of the agricultural commodity produced by any producer included in the group to which the referendum is submitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 10, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4471.
Voting areas and other voting details set by Commissioner.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations, and the area within which the referendum authorized with respect to the agricultural commodity referred to shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture. The referendum date, area, hours, voting places, and rules and regulations with respect to the holding of the referendum shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of the referendum, and direct written notice shall likewise be given to each county or area agent in any county in which the agricultural product is produced. The notice shall contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed fifteen hundredths of one percent (0.15%) of the value of the year’s production of the agricultural commodity grown by the producer included in the group to which the referendum is submitted, and shall likewise state the method by which the assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds thereof shall be administered and the purposes to which the proceeds shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4473.
Commissioner to publish the question on, and the result of, the referendum.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall likewise prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum the question to be presented to the voters, and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum; and following the referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4475.
Assessment to be levied and collected by agency conducting referendum.

If, in the referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, a majority of the producers eligible to participate and voting therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of the levying and collection of the assessment proposed in the referendum on the agricultural commodity, then the assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the agency conducting the referendum.

Any agricultural cooperative association organized under KRS Chapter 272 or 272A, any foreign agricultural cooperative association, or any foreign limited cooperative association that has received a certificate of authority to conduct business in the Commonwealth in the same manner as a domestic agricultural cooperative association, on application to an approval by the Commissioner, may by an alternate procedure, not in conflict with the purposes of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, handle the collection and disbursement of the assessments of its members. The purchaser of the agricultural commodity of the members of the association shall be relieved of the collecting and reporting requirements of KRS

247.4477

with respect to the members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 160, § 136, effective July 12, 2012.

247.4477.
Assessment to be deducted from the purchase price of the commodity — Use of funds.

In the event a majority of the producers eligible for participation in the referendum and voting therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, then, upon the written request of the duly certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers of the agricultural commodity, the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by certified mail, all persons engaged in the business of purchasing the agricultural commodities in this state, that on and after the date specified in the letter, the specified assessment shall be deducted from the producer’s payment by the purchaser, or his agent or representative, from the purchase price of the agricultural commodity. The assessment so deducted shall be remitted by the purchaser to the duly certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of the producers entitled to it on or before the final day of the month following the end of the month in which the commodity is sold to the purchaser. The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, through educational and applied research programs, the increased production of the agricultural commodity. The books and records of all the purchasers of the agricultural commodity shall at all times during regular business hours be open for inspection by the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 14, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4479.
Refund of assessment.

In the event the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers a refund of the assessment collected from the producer, if the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts. 1990, ch. 167, § 15, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4481.
Annual review of assessment program — Termination by referendum — Termination by request of certified operating agency.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of each year after the first year of the assessment program, the board determines that twenty-five percent (25%) of the producers are not participating in the program, the Commissioner shall then conduct a referendum among the producers. If, upon the referendum, a majority of the producers eligible to participate and voting therein reject the program, it shall be terminated as at the end of the month in which the referendum was conducted and held; otherwise the assessment program shall continue in force and effect.

If the certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the assessment, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the month in which the board action is taken; and in this event the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, the purchasers of the agricultural commodity of the termination of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 16, effective July 13, 1990.

247.4483.
Injunction proceedings to halt practices in violation of KRS 247.4451 to 247.4483.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers, a purchaser has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the sections of KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

, the board or the certified commission, council, board, association, or other agency of producers may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining the act or acts or practices and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 167, § 17, effective July 13, 1990.